Nevada, session 83, AB484.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. NRS 439A.116 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
439A.116 1. The Director shall establish and maintain a
database of information collected from applicants for the renewal of
a license, certificate or registration as a provider of health care. The
information in the database must include, for each applicant from
whom such information is collected:
(a) The type of license, certificate or registration held by the
applicant;
(b) The race and ethnicity of the applicant;
(c) The sex of the applicant;
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 2 –
(d) The primary language spoken by the applicant;
[(d)] (e) The specialty area in which the applicant practices;
[(e)] (f) Any other jurisdiction where the applicant holds the
same type of license, certificate or registration that the applicant is
currently renewing;
(g) The county of this State in which the applicant spends the
majority of his or her working hours;
[(f)] (h) The address of each location at which the applicant
practices or intends to practice and the percentage of working hours
spent by the applicant at each location;
[(g)] (i) The type of practice in which the applicant engages,
including, without limitation, individual private practice, group
private practice, multispecialty group private practice, government
or nonprofit;
[(h)] (j) The settings in which the applicant practices, including,
without limitation, hospitals, clinics and academic settings;
[(i)] (k) Whether the applicant utilizes telehealth, as defined in
NRS 629.515, in his or her practice;
(l) The education and primary and secondary specialties of the
applicant;
[(j)] (m) The average number of hours worked per week by the
applicant and the total number of weeks worked by the applicant
during the immediately preceding calendar year;
[(k)] (n) The percentages of working hours during which the
applicant engages in patient care and other activities, including,
without limitation, teaching, research and administration;
[(l)] (o) The types of patients whom the applicant serves,
including, without limitation, newborns, children, adolescents,
adults, senior citizens, pregnant persons, veterans, incarcerated
persons, persons with disabilities, persons who speak a language
other than English, persons who are recipients of Medicaid or
Medicare and persons who pay on a sliding fee scale;
(p) Any planned major changes to the practice of the applicant
within the immediately following 5 years, including, without
limitation, retirement, relocation or significant changes in working
hours; and
[(m)] (q) Any other information prescribed by regulation of the
Director.
2. The Director shall develop and make available to each
professional licensing board that licenses, certifies or registers
providers of health care an electronic data request that solicits the
information described in subsection 1 from an applicant for the
renewal of such a license, certificate or registration.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 3 –
3. Except as otherwise provided in this subsection, information
included in the database is confidential and not a public record. The
Director shall:
(a) Take all necessary measures to ensure the confidentiality of
the identity of providers of health care to whom information in the
database pertains, including, without limitation, measures to ensure
that the identity of a provider of health care is not ascertainable due
to his or her reported profession or the reported location at which he
or she practices.
(b) Make data from the database that does not contain any
information that could be used to identify an applicant for or the
holder of a license, certificate or registration as a provider of health
care available to the Working Group. The Working Group may use
such data to support the recommendations made pursuant to NRS
439A.121 or include such data in any report published pursuant to
that section.
(c) Publish an annual report of data from the database that does
not contain any information that could be used to identify an
applicant for or holder of a license, certificate or registration as a
provider of health care.
(d) Analyze the data in the database and make periodic reports
to the Legislature, the Department and other agencies of the
Executive Branch of the State Government concerning ways in
which to:
(1) Attract more persons, including, without limitation,
members of underrepresented groups, to pursue the education
necessary to practice as a provider of health care and practice as a
provider of health care in this State; and
(2) Improve health outcomes and public health in this State.
Sec. 2. 1. This section becomes effective upon passage and
approval.
2. Section 1 of this act becomes effective:
(a) Upon passage and approval for the purpose of adopting any
regulations and performing any other preparatory administrative
tasks that are necessary to carry out the provisions of this act; and
(b) On January 1, 2026, for all other purposes.
20 ~~~~~ 25
-
83rd Session (2025)